Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section and section 480.45, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Judicial official" means: (1) every Minnesota district court judge, senior judge, retired judge, and every judge of the Minnesota Court of Appeals and every active, senior, recalled, or retired federal judge who resides in Minnesota; (2) a current or retired justice of the Minnesota Supreme Court; (3) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch; (4) judicial referees and magistrate judges; and (5) current and retired judges and current employees of the Office of Administrative Hearings, new text begin Department of Employment and Economic Development Unemployment Insurance and Paid Leave Appeals Divisions, new text end Department of Human Services Appeals Division, Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, and Tax Court. (c) "Personal information" does not include publicly available information. Personal information means: (1) a residential address of a judicial official; (2) a residential address of the spouse, domestic partner, or children of a judicial official; (3) a nonjudicial branch issued telephone number or email address of a judicial official; (4) the name of any child of a judicial official; and (5) the name of any child care facility or school that is attended by a child of a judicial official if combined with an assertion that the named facility or school is attended by the child of a judicial official. (d) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by a judicial official, or by a person to whom the judicial official has disclosed the information, unless the judicial official has restricted the information to a specific audience. (e) "Law enforcement support organizations" do not include charitable organizations. (f) "Real property records" has the meaning given in section 480.50, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.50, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "County recorder" has the meaning given in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (4). (c) "Government entity" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. (d) "Judicial official" has the meaning given in section 480.40, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), except that it does not include: (1) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch, the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, or the Tax Court; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) judges or employees in the Department of Human Services Appeals Divisionnew text begin ; or (3) judges or employees in the Unemployment Insurance and Paid Leave Appeals Divisionsnew text end . (e) "Personal information" has the meaning given in section 480.40, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). (f) "Real property records" means any of the following: (1) real property records as defined in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (5); (2) Uniform Commercial Code filings and tax liens maintained by the Secretary of State; and (3) any other records maintained by a county recorder or other government entity evidencing title to, or any lien, judgment, or other encumbrance on, real or personal property. (g) "Responsible authority" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 16.